New York, session 2025-2026, A4648.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "September 11th no fare program act". 3 § 2. Section 1266 of the public authorities law is amended by adding a 4 new subdivision 20 to read as follows: 5 20. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law or the terms of any 6 contract, the authority, in consultation with the Long Island Rail Road, 7 shall establish and implement a no fare program for transportation on 8 the Long Island Rail Road for emergency responders, which shall include 9 emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, 10 firefighters, fire officers, fire marshals, or auxiliary police who are 11 employed or duly enrolled by the city of New York, the county of Nassau, 12 Nassau county villages and cities, the county of Suffolk, or Suffolk 13 county villages. Such no fare program shall occur each year on the elev- 14 enth day of September. The no fare program established and implemented 15 pursuant to this subdivision shall occur only on the eleventh of Septem- 16 ber of each year during all hours in which the Long Island Rail Road 17 provides services, and such program shall not be limited in operation to 18 off-peak hours or to any other hours designated by the Long Island Rail 19 Road. Any eligible emergency responder shall be required to be in 20 uniform and shall be required to show proper identification, including a 21 shield or badge, or any other designated identification form authorized 22 by the authority in order to be eligible for the no fare program. This 23 program shall not affect any other no fare program currently implemented 24 by the authority or any of its subsidiary corporations. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08806-01-5 A. 4648 2 1 § 3. Rules and regulations. The chair of the metropolitan transporta- 2 tion authority is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations 3 necessary for the implementation of this act on or before the effective 4 date of this act. 5 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 6 section two of this act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth 7 day after it shall have become a law.